ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/de_CH/hyph_de_CH.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.3
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.ar2s2
.a2n1s
.a1n1e
.an1gr2
.an3k
.as1t1
.ae1
.a1b1u
.au2s1
.au3s4se2n.
.aus1s
.aus1se
.aus3t
.a2u1t
.au2f1
.r2
.ra1b
.ro1b
.ru3s2se
.o2
.o4ma
.n2
.n1a1b
.i2
.in1
.s2
.si1g
.1si
.sch2
.1sc
.schlie3s1se
.s2chl
.schlies2s
.st2
.s4ti
.s4te
.hei3s2se
.e2
.er1ob
.e1r1i
.e1r1e
.er3bl
.er1b
.er4drü
.er1dr2
.er1k
.en2dr2
.en2d3e2r
.en1de
.en2t
.ent3ei
.en1te
.ek1
.e4ta
.ex1e
.b2
.bau1s
.1ba
.be1ra
.b2er
.ber2gi
.ber1g
.äs1
.äu1
.äus2
.d2
.de2rei
.1de
.de1re
.de1l
.li2v
.u2
.un1s2t
.u2ns
.u1n1e
.ul1
.um1
.g2
.grü1s2
.gr2
.1grü
.grö3s1se
.grös2s
.gies3
.1gi
.ge1s2
.1ge
.geschri3en
.ge3sc
.gesch2
.geschri2e
.gespi3en
.ge1sp2
.ge1spi
.gespi2e
.geb2
.ge1bl
.k2
.2ko1o
.1ko
.ku3s
.1ku
.t2
.tras3
.1ti2
.m2
.mi2t
.1mi
.v2ol2
.1v
.p2
.prob3l
.pro1
.1prob
.zi2s
.1zi
.zi2e
.zi3g
.for4t
.1fo
.wi2s
.wert1ma3
.wert1m
.que2
.1q
.qu2
2a.
a1an
aa1c
aa1b
a1ra
ara1b
ar1all
ar1au
ara1ge2
ar1af
arri1e
ar1ri
a1ro
ar1o1d
2a1ri
ar1inn
ari1es
ar2schr
ars2
ar1sc
ar2s2ch2m
ar1s3p2
1ar1c
a1re
a2re2h
are2b
are2k
a1rä
ar2les
ar1l
a1ru
ar1um
ar2gl
ar1g
a1r1ü1
ar2tho
art1he
ar1tu
a1on
ao1i
a1os
a1ou
a3ot
anas1
an1or
a1ni
a1ni1g
ansich4
a2ns
an1si
an3sc
anschlie3
an2schli
ans2chl
an1s1h
an1s2kr
an1s2t
an1ei
a1ne
1anek
an1em
1an1b
an1äs
an1dac
and2sa
an2ds
an2d3eng
an1de
ande2s3
1an1l
a1nu
an2gä2
an1g1li
1an1ka
an2kre
an1kr
1an1kä
1an1tr
1ant1w
anz1w
1an1fa
a1nö
ai1e
a3ig
a1i1v
a1sa
a2s2ch2m
a1sc
2a3se
a1su
as1ke
ast1au
ast1ro
as1to
a1s1tä
as1tu
as1p2
a1sy
a1ca
ach1au
ach1r
a2ch1n2
a1chi
a1che
a2chent
ach1ei
a2ch1l
a1chu
a2ch3m
ach1w
a1ce
a1cki
ac2k
ahal2
ah1au
ah1re
ah1os
ah2n1s2
ah1nu
a1hi
a1he
ahe1s
ah1li
ah1le
ah3mu
a1el
ab1r
3abre
ab1ir
a1bi
ab1it
1a2b1s
abs2te
1ab1h
a1bes
ab1ä
1ab1d
ab1l
1a2b1k
1ab1v
1ab1z
1a2b1f
ad1r2
ad1op
a2d1s
al1ang
ala2sc
al1ab
al1au
a1l1ak
a1lo
a1li
al2stü
al1sp2
a2l1c
a1le
a2lei
a2l1el
a1l1ef
albibli3
al1bi
albi1b
albib1l
a1lä
alk1s1
a2lk
1alt1r
2a1ly
2au.
au1a
au1r
auri1e
au1ri
2aui
2au1so
aus1s
2au2s2c
aus1ta
aus3tre
2auc
2aue
2aub
aub1l
2auk
au1ta
a2ut
2aum
2auz
au2fo
1auf1n
ag1ar
a1ga
ag1an
aga2b
a2g1au
ag1ri
agr2
a3go
agi3er.
a1gi
ag1sa
a2gs
a2gent
a1ge
age2s2
ag3es1se
ages3s
age3st
a2gem
ag1l
a1gy
a2ka1d
a1ka
a1k1r
a1ki
a1ke
a1kl
a1ta
at1ar
ata1s
a1t1r
at1ort
at1s3si
a2ts
ats1s
at2s1e
at1sp2
at2c
a2t1hil
ateno1
a1te
a3ten
a2t1eig
a2teb
a1tu
a1tü
at1tr
at2t1s
at1th
atz1w
2ams
2amet
a1me
amt1a
amt1h
am1p1r
a2mp
am2pl
2a1v
ave3re2
ave2
aver1
a1pa
ap1rop
apro1
ap1rof
apo1s
a1pi
a1ph
a1pe
ap2fa
a1z
azie4
a1zi
a2fa
a3far
af1an
af1r
af2tau
af1ta
a1w
awi1
aje2
a1j
ay1
a1xi
a1xe
1r2a.
1r2a1ri
1r1ar1c
2r1ar1b
2r1art
r1arm
r1arz
r1an1r
rans1p2
ra2ns
r1anf
r1an1w
ra1ha
r1ahn
2r1ab1d
ra1da
1ra2l.
1ra1le
r1alt
1ralf
1ral1w
2ra2ut
ra1gr2
r3a2gent
ra1ge
r1ak1k
1ra1to
1rath
r1amt
1ra1pr
1ra1z
r1ra
r1ro
rr1ob
r1ri
rri2s
rr1c
r1re
r1rä
r1ru
rr2ut3
r1rü
rr1tu
ro1a
ro1ri
r2on
ro2n1a
1roi
ro1is
ros1i1o
ro1si
ro1sk
ro2s1te
ro1s1w
ro1ch
r2oc
ro1ben
1rou
ro1pe
1roy1
r1na
r2n1ab
r2n1au
r1no
rn1ost
r1nos
r1ni
rn2sof
r2ns
rn1so
rn1str
rn1sp2
rn1ers2
r1ne
r1nä
r1nu
r1nü
rn3ta
1ri1a
ri2as
1r1ir
ri3ot
ri1o
r3inner
rin1ne
2ri2ns
ri2st
1rie1a
ri1ern
ri1en
1ri1el
1rie1z
r2ig
1ri1ge
1rik
ri2k1ar
ri1ka
ri1ki
r2it
ri1ta
ri1ph
1riz
rs2
r1sa
rs3ang
rs3n2
r3si
rs3s
r3sche
r1sc
rs3h
r2s3e2mp
r1se
r1su
r1sü2
r1star
r1stan
r1stal
r1stat
r1staf
r1str
r1sto
r1s2tei
rs1te
rs3tem
r1stu
rs3m
r1sp2
rs3pek
r1sy
r1ca
rch1au
rch1st
r2c2hs
r1che
rch1ei
r2ch1l
r2ch3m
r1h
1r2hy
1r2e.
1rer
3rer.
r1erst
rers2
r1er1l
3rer1g
2rerk
r1er1ka
r1er1ke
r1erkl
2r1erz
1re2n.
r2ena
rent1h
2rent1w
ren3ma3s2
ren1m
ren1ma
2r1ein1r
rei2ns4
rein3s3t2e.
reins1te
reis3s
rei3sc
rei1ta
1re2s.
2re1sc
1re1su
1rest
res1ta
re1s1tr
re1s1p2
2reh
2ree
re1el
1reda
re1d
re1le
1reg
re2t2s
2r1e2mp
re1po
re2pl
1re1z
1re1fe
r1e2w
r1b
rb2st
r2bs
r2bli
r3blie
rb2le
3r2ä2n.
3r2ä1ni1
1rä1i
rä2c2hs1
1rä1e
1räl
2räg
1rät
rda2
rd1a1me
r1dr2
rd1ran
r3dri
r1do
r2ds2
rd1st
r2d3er1ge
r1de
rder1g
r1dä
r2d1t
r1l
r2l1c
1ru1a
r1ur
2r1u2n1s
1ru1i
rus2se
1ruh
2ruk1tu
r2ut2
ru1ta
rut3h
1ru1me
1ruf
ruf2s
ruf2t
r1g
rg2ab
r1ga
r2g1au
rgra1
rgr2
rgrös3
r2gno
rg1n
rg1s1k
r2gs
rge2ns2
r1ge
rgen3st
rg1lo
rüs1
rü1be2
r1k2n2
r1ki
rk1sta
rks2t
rk1str
r1ke
r1kla
rk1lic
rk2tei
rk1te
r1ta
r2t1ar
r1ta2b1l
r1tr
r1to
r3ti
rt1su
r2ts
rt1hi
rt1hei
r2t1eig
r1te
r1tä
r2t1un2d1
r1tum
r1tü
rt1t
rt1z
r1tö
rm1ana
r1ma
r3mac
rm1sp2
r1mä
rva1
r1v
r1p2
r2ps
rz1ar
r2z1in
r1zi
r2z1eng
r1ze
rz1wa
r1zwi
r1fr
r1fl
r2f1lic
r3fu
r1w
rwi2s
r1ör
rös2s
rö3sser
rös1se
rö1c
rö2den
rö1de
r1ö2f
r1x
2o.
o1an
o1ah
o1ab
o1al
o1au
o1at
o1ap
o1ra
o2rank
ora2s
o2rah
o2rab
or1au
o1ro1
orin1
o1r2it
or1sta
ors2
o1re
or1ein
1or2d1n
or2g1n
or1g
or2g1l
o1r1ü1
ork1s
or2t1an
or1ta
ort1s2t
or2ts
ort3ent
or1te
or3ten
orte4ten
or1te3te
or1tu
o1ry
ook1
oo2mo
o1op
o1na
on2au
o1no
on2na
o1ni
2on2s.
o2ns
ons1a
ons1s3ta
ons1s
onss2t
ons1ta
ons3te
ons1p2
o1nä
onli2
on1l
o1nu
on1gr2
on3f
1o1ny
o1il
o3sa
os1o1d
o1so
o2ss
oss3elt
os1se
oss3te
oss2t
o3se
o1su
os1ke
ost1a
os2th
o1s3tel
os1te
o1s1tü
os1pe
osp2
o1sy
2oc
och1a
o1che
o2ch1l
o1chu
o2ch3m
och1w
o1cki
oc2k
o1ha
oh1re
o1ho
oh1nu
o2h1s
o1he
ohl1a
oh1lo
oh1li
o1hu
o1ei
o1e2b
o1el
o1et
o1ex
ob1ac
o1ba
ob1r
ob1sa
o2bs
1ober1h
ob2er
o1bel
ob1li
1ob1j
o1d
o3di
2ol
o1la
o1lo
o1li
o1le
ole1ra
o1ler
ol1da
ol2lin
ol1li
oll3end
ol1le
ol1len
ol2lu
o1lu
o2lk2
ol2pr
ol1p
ou2s
ou1b
2o1g
o2gu
o1ü
o3ka
o1ki
o1ke
o1kl
ok1le
2ot
o1ta
o1to
ot1s2t
o2ts
o1t2h
o2teb
o1te
otem1
o2te2mp2
o1tu
ott1h
o2m1au
o1ma
om1s2t
o1pa
o1pr
op1ri
o1po
o1pi
o1ph
o1pä
op1li
o1pl
op2pl
op2f1es
op1fe
o1z
oze1r
o1ze
of1r
of2fa
2ow
o1wa
o1wo
o1wi
o1we
o1ye
oqu1i2e
o1q
oqu2
o1xo
o1xi
o1xe
2n.
3n2a.
1naa
n1art
n1a2n.
n1ana
2n1an1r
1nann
n1a2ns
1na1ne
n1an1d
4nander1r2
nan1de
2n1an1g
n1anf
1nass
na2ch
1nah
n1ab
2n1ab1h
na1bel
1nad
nal1s
n1au
1n2au.
1n2aui
4naus1se
naus1s
1n2aue
nauf1
1nag
1na2ka
1nat
na1to
2n1at1m
1na1me
n1amt
n1r
nra2s
1n2o.
1nor1s2
n1or1g
n1ort
1noi
1nos
no1bl
1n2ol
n3o1le
1nok
1nom
1no1v
1no1z
n1na
nn1ar
n1no
n1ni
nn1sa
n2ns
nne2s
n1ne
n1nä
nnlich3es
nn1l
nnli1che
n1nu
nn1g
n1nü
n1nö
1ni.
2ni2ns
n1i2n1h
n1int
n1in3f
1nis
ni1ern
ni1en
nie1s
ni1el
n1id
1nig
nig1re
nigr2
ni2gel
ni1ge
1nik
ni1ta
1nim
1niz
2ns
ns1ar
ns1ang
ns3a2c2ht
n3sac
ns1alt
ns1auf
ns1ak
ns1s
n3schr
n1sc
n3sche
n2schli
ns2chl
n2s1ers2
n1se
ns1er1k
n2s1ex
n1sur
ns1un
n1sü2
ns2kr
ns1ki
n1stan
n1s2tad
n1stat
ns1t1ru
n1sto
n1s2tie
ns1ti
n1s2til
n1s3ti3t
n1s2t2if
n1s2tei
ns1te
n1s2teu
n1stu
ns1pir
nsp2
n1spi
ns1pek
ns2pu
ns2ze
ns1z
n1sy
n1c
2n1h
1ne
ne2a
3ne3ar
ne3an
3neal
ne3a2l.
n2er.
ne1ra
ne1ro
n1erk
2n1er1zi
nen1st
ne2ns
1ne1ne2
2n1ener
2n1ent1n
2n1ent1z
n1ent1w
n1ei1na
n1ein3f
n2e1it
ne2st
2nec
n1eh2r1
2nee1
ne1b1r
ne1be2
2ne1d
2nelt
ne1k1r
net1au
ne1ta
ne1t1r
n1e2mp
2nep
3ne1w
n1b
nbe1ra
nb2er
nbe1s
1näl
nd1ar1b
n1dal
nd1ak
n1dam
nd1run
ndr2
n1dru
nd1ort
nd1op
nde2a
n1de
n2d1ei
nde2s
n1dä
n2d1urs2
n1du
ndur2
n2d1um
nd1ta
n2dt
n1l
nlö1
1nua
nu1ar
2n1uni
n1und1
1nung
n1unt
1nu1i
3nus2
nu1s1k
nus3p2
nu1e
1nug
1n2ut
n2g1at
n1ga
n1gra
ngr2
ng1ram
n2g1or
n1go
ng1lo
ng1li
1nü.
1nüs
n1üb
1nül1
1nüg
1nüt
n2k1ak
n1ka
nkamp3fe
nka2mp2
n2k1op
n1ko
nk1no
nkn2
n1ki
nki1e
nk1s1am
nk1sa
nk1str
nks2t
n1ke
n2k1erf
n2k1är2
n1kä
n1kla
n1klo
nk1lic
n1klu
n1ta
n2t1ark
nt1art
nt1anz
n2tauf
n1tr
nt1ras2
nt1rad
n3trop
n2trin
nt1ric
n2t1rec
nt1ru
n2t1rü
n1to
n3ti
n2ti1c
nt3s2o
n2ts
nt1s2t
nt1sp2
nt1hä
nt1hü
nte2n1s
n1te
n3ten
n3tem
nte3zei4
nte1z
nte1ze
n1tä
n1tu
n1tü
nt1t
nt1z
n1tö
n1m
nme2n2s
n1me
n1p2
nprob3l
npro1
n1prob
nzi2n
n1zi
nz1i1ni
nz2so
nz1s2
n1fr
nfi2s2
n1fi
n1fl
n2fu
n1fö
n1w
3nös
nö1c
1nöt
n1öf
1ny
i1a
ia1b
ial1a
i3au
i2a1g
i3ag1n
ir2ner
ir1ne
i1ri
ir2s2
i1re
i1rä
i1ru
irk1l
i1o
io1ri
ion2
io2ns1
i2os
i2o1c
i1na
i2n1a2s
i2nad
i2n1a2m
in1or
2in1ny
i1ni
in1sa
i2ns
in3sc
inschlies3
in2schli
ins2chl
ins1ta
in1str
in1sp2
i3nen
i1ne
in1ei
i1nä
in3dr2
in3de
in1gr2
ing1le
i1nü1
in1kn2
in2tan
in1ta
in1th
in3f
i1i2
i1sa
isa1b
is1s1u
iss3tru
iss2t
is1str
i2scha
i1sc
i3sche
is3ho
is1h
is1e3in3f
i1se
i1su
is1k
is1tal
is1tr
ist1ra
is2t1re
is1to
i1s2t2if
is1ti
is1th
i1stem
is1te
is1tu
i1spo
isp2
i1sy
i1ca
i1cho
i1che
i2ch1l
i1chu
i2ch3m
ich1w
i1cki
ic2k
i3cke
ih1ar
i1hal
ih1r
ih1n
i1hi
i1he
ih1l
i1hu
i2h1um
i1hö
ie1ran
ie1r1au
i1e1ro
ie2r1in
ie1ri
ier1ec
ie1re
ier1k
i1e2n.
ie1n1ab
i1en1r
ie2no
i1en2s.
ie2ns
i1en1b
i1end
i1eng
i1enk
i1en1m
i1en1p2
i1enz
i1en3f
i1en1w
i1ei
ies2s
ie2sc
ies3che
iesch2
ie1s2ti
ie2c2k2
ie1e
ieen1
ie2br
ieb2se
ie2bs
ie2la
ie1lem
i1ell
i1eu
ie2g1r2
i1e1tä
i1ett
i1ba1
i1bri
i2bs2
i1be
ibe1ra
ib2er
i2b1ei
i1bä
ib1l
ib2lei
i1ä
i1da
id1r2
i1do
i1la
il1ar
i2l1a2ns
il1ad
i2l1ak
i1lo
i1li
i2l1ind
ilin1du3
il1ip
il1sp2
i1le
il1eis
i1lä
i1lu
il2min
il1mi
i1u
iund1
ig1art
i1ga
i1g1rä
igr2
i1gna
ig1n
ig1s2pr
i2gs
igs1p2
ig1he
ig1l
i2g3g
i1k1r
ik1in
ik1s2t
i1ke
i2k1ei
i2kä
ik1le
ik1ta
ik1t1h
ik1t1u
it1ar1b
it1art
it2a2ns
ita1s
it1a2b.
it3au2s.
it1auf
it1rau
it1re
i1trä
it1räu
i1tru
i1to
i3ti
1iti1a
it3s1ag
i2ts
it2s1e
it1spa
itsp2
it1hi
it1hä
i3te2n
i1te
it1ein
i2tes1m
i1tä
i1tu
i1t1ü
ima2ge
i1ma
im1s2t
i1mä
imt1h
i2v1r
i1v
i1pa
i1po
i1pi
i1pe
i1p1l
i1za
2if
if1r
if3l
if2tr
if2t1s
i1w
i1ö
i2que
i1q
iqu2
i1xi
i1xe
2s.
1s2a.
2s1ar1b
3sann
s1a2ns
1sand
2s3anz
s1an1w
sa1ik
3s2as
sa1sk
3sac
1sah
sa1d
1sa1la
sall4
sal3l3es
sal1le
sa1lu
3sag
sa2ka
1sat
sa1to
s1at1m
1sam
1saf
s1r
s3ra
sra2t2s
s3re
s1rä4t
s3ru
1so
so1ri
s3ord
so1o
3son
soi2
s2o1c
sok1
s1n2
sni1
s3nu
s3nö
1si
si3on2
si1o
s1i2n1s
si1en
3sid
3si1u
si1g1ne
sig1n
s1sa
s3si
ss1s
ss1e3in3f
s1se
s3ses
s1su
ss1k
ss2t
s4s2t.
s1sta
s1str
s1s1ti
s3stä
s1sp2
ss2pl
s1sy
1sc
2sca
2s1co
2s2ch.
2scham
3schi
schi2e
2s2c2hs
2sch1c
2s2ch1h
2sch1b
2sch1k
2s2c2ht
2sch1v
s1h
s2ho
s3h2oc
s3hof
s3he
s3hy
1se
se1ra
2ser1h
se2r1ei
se1re
ser1k
ser1ma1
ser3mas2
2s1er1fo
2s1er1w
se1o
sen3str
se2ns
3senk
4sent1w
s1ein3f
3s2eil
2s1eig
3seit
se1sta
se1stu
se2hi
se2ei
se1b
se2lo
sel1st
3sell
se1um
se2ke
2se2mp
s1e2va
se1v
2sex
2s1b
1sä
2säm
s1d
s3do
sdä1
s1l
s3li
s3le
s3unf
su1iz
1suc
su1e
1su2b1
s1um1f
1sup
2s1g
s3gr2
sgie1
s1gi
s3ge
sge1s2
s3gl
sü2
1süc
s1üb
s3kra
s1kr
s2ko2o
s1ko
s3kin
s1ky
2s2t.
1staa
sta2s
1stah
s2tad
1staun
st1akt
stra1s2
st1rad
s1t1r2on
st1ros
2st1r2ig
1st1rik
1strö
1stoh
1stof
1s2tic
s1ti
s2til
2s3tik
1s2tim
s2tip
s2t2if
s2t1s
s2t1ho
st1hi
s1the
st1hä
2s3t2e.
s1te
2s3ten
s2tei
s3tes
1s2tec2k
1s2teh
1s2tel
s2teu
3steue
1ste2g
1stä
2s3tus
1stu1d
1stuf
1stü
st1t
st1z
1stö
s1m
smu2se1
s1mu
s3mus
s3vo
s1v
s3vä
sp2
2s1paa
spa1ni1
1spa1z
1spra
1spru
s3pos
s1p2ol
1spi
s2pi1o
spi2e
1spei
1spü
s1pf
s1z
s3zu
s1f
s3fe
s1w
s3wo
s3wi
s3wu
1sö
s1öf
syn1
sym3
ca2c
ca1b
cre2me
1co
co1ri
cont1
co2d
col1le2
c2ol
1ci
c1s
c1c
2ch.
ch1ang
1cha1e
ch1ak
ch2ru
1ch2ow
2chn2
2c2hs
2ch1h
ch1ero
che2rü
ch1e2b
2chl
ch2lu
ch1üb
2c2ht
2ch2m
1ce1a
cen1g
ce1le
cä1
1cu
c2k
2ck.
ck1an
c1ka
c1k1r
ck1n2
ck1s1te
cks2t
1cke
2ck1ero
2cker1p2
ck1l
1c1ku
c3k1ur
ck1ta
1cky
c1t
c1m
2h2a.
har2s2
h1ar1b
har2me
ha1it
h1ahm
ha1e
ha1be
ha1b1l
ha1de2
hr1ar
h1rand
h1rat
hr1am
h1rop
h1ric
hri2e
hr2su
hrs2
hr1c
h1re2s
hre1s1e
h1re1d
h1rel
h1rep
hr1äm
h1ru
h1rü
hr1z
ho2s1p2
ho2ch1
h2oc
ho1b
1holz
h2ol
ho2me
hom2me
hn1ar
h1nam
hn1op
h2ns2
hn1su
hn1sk
hn1sta
hn3e1ra
h1ne
h2n1er1h
h2nei
h2nel
hn1är
h1nun
h1i1a
hi1n1a
hi2nar
hi2n1s
hi1nu
hip1h
2hs
h1sa
h2san
hsie3b
h1si
h2s1ec
h1se
hs1un
h1stan
h1stab
hs1tau
h1str
h1s1ti
hs1th
h1stun
hstu1di3
h1stu1d
hs1tum
h1sp2
hs1par
h1c
h1h
he1ra
her1an
her1c
her1ei
he1re
h1er1zä
2heo1
hen1a
